Washington statutes.
RCW 43.85.210

Investment deposits and rate of interest—Demand and time accounts authorized.

The state treasurer may deposit state moneys or funds at interest in any qualified public depositary upon a demand or time account basis.

[ 1983 c 66 s 18; 1965 c 8 s 43.85.210. Prior: 1955 c 198 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 66: See note following RCW 39.58.010.